Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-501
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-501 to 13-514 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Budget Act.

Laws 1969, c. 145, § 50, p. 701;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-933;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 2;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 310, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 15;

Laws 1994, LB 1257, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1017;

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 86, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 939, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 1.
July 18, 2026
For applicability to school districts and educational service units, see section 13-517.